Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 1 Purposes and Preliminary Matters

Law reviews.

For note discussing the interrelationship between the International Banking Act, the provisions of the Financial Institutions Code relating to domestic banking, and the Foreign Corporations Chapter of the Corporation Code in the regulation of international banking in Georgia and comparing Georgia provisions with those of New York and California, see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 827 (1976).

7-1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Institutions Code of Georgia” (hereinafter called “this chapter”).

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-2.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the sound, efficient, and responsive operation of financial institutions is essential to the livelihood of the people of this state and to the stability and growth of the economy of this state and region and vitally affects the public interest.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-3.
Objectives of chapter; standards for construction and regulation.

The underlying objectives of this chapter are to provide for:

Safe and sound operation of financial institutions;

Proper conservation of the assets of financial institutions;

Public confidence in financial institutions;

Protection for the interests of the depositors, creditors, and shareholders of financial institutions;

Service by financial institutions responsive to the needs and convenience of depositors, borrowers, and other customers and conducive to economic progress and, to these ends, opportunities to expand services and facilities;

Appropriate competition among financial institutions and between them and other financial organizations including those organized under the laws of the United States, other states, and foreign countries;

Delegation to the department of rule-making power and administrative discretion in order that supervision of financial institutions may be flexible and responsive to changes in economic conditions and banking, fiduciary, and other commercial practices;

Opportunity for management of financial institutions to exercise their business judgment;

Simplification and modernization of the law governing banking, trust, and other financial institutions; and

As to other entities under the supervision of the department that are not financial institutions, including check cashers and mortgage lenders and brokers, to provide for:

Supervision and examination of their business affairs to ensure that they operate in a manner consistent with state law;

Protection of the interests of consumers and service by these entities which is responsive to their consumers; and

Simplification and modernization of the law that governs these entities, together with the delegation of rulemaking power and administrative discretion to the department to carry out its responsibilities, keeping in mind the need for economic and technological progress in the industry.

This chapter shall be construed and applied to promote the foregoing objectives and they shall constitute standards to be observed by the department in promulgating rules and regulations, issuing cease and desist orders, conducting examinations, and exercising discretionary powers and in connection with all other matters embraced by this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 1.

7-1-4.
Definitions.

Subject to additional definitions contained in the subsequent provisions of this chapter, as used in this chapter, the term:

“Affiliate” means any corporation, business trust, association, or other similar organization:

Of which a financial institution, directly or indirectly, owns or controls either a majority of the voting shares or more than 50 percent of the number of shares voted for the election of its directors, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions at the preceding election or controls in any manner the election of a majority of its directors, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions;

Of which control is held, directly or indirectly, through stock ownership or in any other manner by the shareholders of a financial institution who own or control either a majority of the shares of such financial institution or more than 50 percent of the number of shares voted for the election of directors of such financial institution at the preceding election or by trustees for the benefit of the shareholders of any such financial institutions;

Of which a majority of its directors, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions are directors of any one financial institution; or

Which owns or controls, directly or indirectly, either a majority of the shares of a financial institution or more than 50 percent of the number of shares of a financial institution voted for the election of directors of a financial institution at the preceding election or controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of a financial institution or for the benefit of whose shareholders or members all or substantially all the capital stock of a financial institution is held by trustees.

(1.5)

“Agency relationship” is a relationship created by a contractual agreement whereby a financial institution agrees with a third party, including another financial institution, to act in a principal or agent capacity to facilitate the conduct of activities related to the business of banking, which activities are currently authorized under this chapter or under other applicable law.

“Agreement for the payment of money” means a consensual monetary obligation not in the form of an evidence of indebtedness or an investment security and includes an account or general intangible as defined in Code Section 11-9-102.

Reserved.

“Articles” means original or restated articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation and all the amendments thereto, including articles of merger or conversion, and also includes what heretofore have been designated by law as certificates of incorporation or charters and, in case of foreign corporations, whatever documents are equivalent to “articles” in their jurisdiction of incorporation. After an amendment restating articles in their entirety, the “articles” shall not include any prior documents, and the certificate of amendment issued by the Secretary of State shall so state.

“Assets” means all the property and rights of every kind of a financial institution.

“Attorney” means an attorney at law who is regularly retained as counsel for a financial institution or who is a partner or associate of a firm which is regularly retained as counsel for a financial institution.

“Bank” means a corporation existing under the laws of this state on April 1, 1975, or organized under this chapter and authorized to engage in the business of receiving deposits withdrawable on demand or deposits withdrawable after stated notice or lapse of time; “bank” shall also include national banks located in this state for the purpose of Part 6 of Article 2 of this chapter, relating to deposits, safe-deposit agreements, and money received for transmission, and Article 8 of this chapter, relating to multiple deposit accounts; provided, however, that the term “bank” shall not include a credit union, a savings and loan association, or a licensee under Article 4 of this chapter, but shall include a federal or state credit union for the purposes of Part 6 of Article 2 of this chapter, provided that this inclusion is not intended to grant or expand any powers to credit unions not authorized in Part 6 of Article 2 of this chapter or by other law.

Reserved.

“Capital debt” means the sum of the face value of the subordinated securities of a financial institution issued pursuant to Code Section 7-1-419.

“Capital stock” means the sum of the par value of the authorized shares which have been issued and remain outstanding of a bank or trust company.

Reserved.

“Commercial bank” means a bank authorized to hold deposits subject to check.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“Corporation” means a corporation, whether profit or nonprofit, and includes a professional corporation or joint-stock association, organized under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state, territory, or dependency of the United States or under the laws of a foreign country.

“Credit union” means a cooperative society incorporated under the laws of this state on April 1, 1975, or organized under Article 3 of this chapter and existing for the twofold purpose of promoting thrift among its members and creating a source of credit for them at reasonable rates.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Depositor” means any person or corporation who shall deposit money or items for the payment of money in any financial institution, which funds are subsequently (allowing time for collections) withdrawable either on demand or after a stated notice or lapse of time, whether interest is allowed thereon or not, and shall also include:

Holders of demand and time certificates of deposit;

Owners of certified or cashiers’ checks and checks purchased from a licensee under Article 4 of this chapter; and

Shareholders in credit unions, federal credit unions, and savings and loan associations to the extent that funds paid in by them are withdrawable within the terms of this definition.

“Evidence of indebtedness” means a note, draft, or similar negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument.

“Federal credit union” means an association organized pursuant to the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. Sections 1750-1795i.

“Fiduciary” means an executor, administrator, guardian, receiver, trustee, assignee for benefit of creditors, or one acting in a similar capacity.

“Financial institution” means:

A bank;

A trust company;

Reserved;

A credit union;

A corporation licensed to engage in the business of selling payment instruments in this state on April 1, 1975, or so licensed pursuant to Article 4 of this chapter;

Business development corporations existing on April 1, 1975, pursuant to the former “Georgia Business Development Corporation Act of 1972,” approved April 3, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 798), or organized pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter;

An international bank agency doing business in this state on April 1, 1975, pursuant to the former “International Bank Agency Act,” approved April 6, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 1140), or authorized to do business in this state pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter;

In addition, as the context requires, a national bank, savings and loan association, or federal credit union for the purpose of the following provisions:

Code Section 7-1-2, relating to findings of the General Assembly;

Code Section 7-1-8, relating to supplementary principles of law;

Code Section 7-1-37, relating to restrictions on officials and personnel;

Code Section 7-1-70, relating to disclosure of information;

Code Section 7-1-90, relating to judicial review of department actions;

Code Sections 7-1-111 and 7-1-112, relating to emergency closings and business restrictions;

Paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-394, relating to criteria to be considered in approving new banks;

Code Section 7-1-840, relating to criminal prosecutions; and

Code Section 7-1-841, relating to application of Title 16 provisions;

A bank holding company as defined in Code Section 7-1-605 for the purposes of Code Sections 7-1-61, 7-1-71, and 7-1-91;

Banks chartered by states other than Georgia for the purposes of paragraph (10) of Code Section 7-1-261, relating to agency relationships;

Federal credit unions for the purposes of Part 6 of Article 2 of this chapter, relating to deposits, safe-deposit agreements, and money received for transmission, and Article 8 of this chapter, relating to multiple-party accounts; and

Banks and credit unions chartered by states other than Georgia, national banks, federal credit unions, and federal savings and loan associations for the purposes of paragraph (1) of Code Section 7-1-650, provided that such institutions have federal deposit insurance.

“Insolvency” means:

Inability to meet liabilities as they become due in the regular course of business; or

Insufficiency in actual cash market value of assets to pay liabilities to depositors and other creditors.

(22.5)

“Main office” means the principal banking location of a bank as such location appears in the records of the Department of Banking and Finance. If a bank does not designate a main office, the department shall choose a banking location of the bank to be the main office.

“National bank” means a national banking association organized pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Section 21-215b.

Reserved.

“Paid-in capital” means the sum of the considerations received in the sale or exchange of shares of a bank or trust company in excess of the amount of the capital stock and includes the surplus, if any, created by or arising out of a reduction of the capital stock of such financial institution effected in a manner permitted by law, any amounts properly regarded as surplus of such financial institution on April 1, 1975.

“Person” means an individual, trust, general or limited partnership, unincorporated association (except a joint-stock association), or any other form of unincorporated enterprise.

“Principal court” means the superior court of the county where the registered office of a financial institution is located or, in the case of a proposed financial institution, will initially be located, as shown in its articles or application for authority to commence business. Whenever under this chapter the principal court is authorized to take any action but lacks, because of constitutional restrictions, jurisdiction or venue over the person or corporation against which such action is to be taken or over the subject matter which is to be affected by its action, then such action may be taken by the superior court of this state in which jurisdiction and venue are proper or, in the absence of any such court, by a court of another state, a federal court, or a court of a foreign country in which jurisdiction and venue are proper.

“Public body” means an agency, authority, board, commission, instrumentality, or similar entity which is part of or connected with the government or political subdivision referred to in the context.

“Public sale” means a sale:

Held at a place reasonably available to persons who might desire to attend and submit bids;

At which those attending shall be given the opportunity to bid on a competitive basis;

At which the sale, if made, shall be made to the highest and best bidder; and

Except as otherwise provided in Title 11 for advertising or dispensing with the advertising of public sales, of which notice is given by advertisement once a week for two weeks in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county where the sale is to be held, and which notice shall state the day and hour, between 9:00 A.M. and 5:00 P.M., and the place of sale and shall briefly identify the goods to be sold.

(29.5)

“Registered agent” means the person or corporation on whom service of process is to be made in a proceeding against a bank. Written notice of any change in the identity or address of a bank’s registered agent must be delivered to the Department of Banking and Finance in addition to and at the same time as such notice is filed with the Secretary of State. The provisions of Part 1 of Article 5 of Chapter 2 of Title 14 shall apply to any such registered agent.

“Registered office” means the location of the registered agent and may be a banking location.

(30.5)

“Retained earnings” means the balance of the net profits, income, gains, and losses from the date of incorporation or from the latest date when a deficit was last eliminated of a financial institution whose articles were granted by the Secretary of State and excludes subsequent distributions to shareholders and transfers to appropriated retained earnings. Retained earnings shall also include any portion of paid-in capital or appropriated retained earnings or, in the case of other organizations, equivalent funds, allocated to retained earnings in mergers, consolidations, or acquisitions of all or substantially all of the property or assets of another such financial institution or other organization permitted by law.

“Savings and loan association” means an association created pursuant to the Home Owners’ Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. Sections 1461-1470, including a federal savings bank.

“Savings bank” means a state chartered bank that has powers no greater than a state bank as provided in this chapter but that may lend and invest in commercial loans in an aggregate amount that does not exceed 50 percent of its total assets. Such bank may elect, subject to department approval, or the department may require that the savings bank comply with selected provisions of the Home Owners’ Loan Act that in the judgment and discretion of the department would be consistent with the charter and purpose of the bank. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “commercial loan” means a loan for business, commercial, corporate, or agricultural purposes.

“Shareholder” means the owner of shares in a financial institution.

“Shares” means the units into which the proprietary interest of the institution is divided.

(34.1)

“State savings and loan association” means a bank which pays interest on substantially all of its depositors’ funds and the majority of whose loans are secured by first liens on or other security interest in residential real property or upon the security of its deposits.

“Statutory capital base” means the sum of the common equity tier 1 capital, as defined by applicable federal law, and the allowance of loan and lease losses, as defined by applicable federal law, as reported in the bank’s most recent Consolidated Report of Condition and Income; provided, however, that the department may enact regulations to phase in the revision to this definition for those banks that will have a decreased statutory capital base as of July 1, 2017. If significant capital changes occur after the filing of the Consolidated Report of Condition and Income which causes the common equity tier 1 capital to increase or decrease by 5 percent or more, then the statutory capital base will be immediately recalculated at the time of the capital change and it will be effective until the filing of the next Consolidated Report of Condition and Income.

“Subject to check” includes withdrawal or transfer by negotiable or transferable order or authorization even though such order or authorization does not constitute a check under Code Section 11-3-104.

“Subsidiary” means a corporation controlled by a financial institution which owns at least a majority of its voting shares.

“Third-party payment service” means any system employing checks, drafts, computer transmissions, or other techniques by which a depositor may effect payment to third parties.

“Treasury shares” means shares of a financial institution which have been issued, have been subsequently acquired by, and belong to the financial institution otherwise than in a fiduciary capacity and have not been canceled. Such shares shall be deemed to be “issued” but not “outstanding” shares.

“Trust company” means a corporation existing under the laws of this state on April 1, 1975, or organized under this chapter and authorized by law to engage in the business of acting as a fiduciary.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2496, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 493, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 949, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 258, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 24; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 1/SB 82; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 7/SB 465; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 1/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 1/HB 141; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 1/HB 239; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 7/HB 942; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 1/HB 184; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3C-1/SB 65; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 1/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (3), substituted “Reserved.” for “ ‘Appropriated retained earnings’ means that portion of the retained earnings of a bank or trust company set aside by resolution of the board of directors as unavailable for the payment of dividends or other distribution to shareholders.”; substituted “actions” for “action” at the end of division (21)(H)(v); deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (21)(J); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (21)(K); added subparagraph (21)(L); and, in paragraph (25), deleted “and the expense fund required by Code Section 7-1-396” following “amount of the capital stock” near the middle and deleted “, and any amounts transferred from the expense fund as permitted by Code Section 7-1-412” following “1975” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

The Georgia Business Development Corporation Act of 1972, referred to in subparagraph (21)(F) of this section, was enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 798, and repealed by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 3(k). The International Bank Agency Act, referred to in subparagraph (21)(G) of this Code section, was enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 1140, and repealed by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 3(j).

Ga. L. 1983, p. 493, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(a) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 1-1/SB 65, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“(a)
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Debtor Creditor Uniform Law Modernization Act of 2015.’

“(b)
To promote consistency among the states, it is the intent of the General Assembly to modernize certain existing uniform laws promulgated by the Uniform Law Commission affecting debtor and creditor rights, responsibilities, and relationships and other federally recognized laws affecting such rights, responsibilities, and relationships.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Agency relationship of financial institutions; Bank service contracts, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-2.

Law reviews.

For survey article on commercial law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (1982).

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-5.
Unauthorized activity as a financial institution.

Whenever it shall appear to the department that any person or corporation is conducting business as a financial institution without authority pursuant to this chapter, the department may determine, for purposes of Parts 4, 7, 8, and 9 of this article, that such person or corporation is a financial institution as defined in paragraph (21) of Code Section 7-1-4.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-410, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 1.

7-1-6.
Notices; waivers of notice.

Except as otherwise expressly provided:

Any notice required to be given under this chapter may be delivered in person or by first-class mail or statutory overnight delivery to the last known address of the person or corporation or to the registered office of the corporation. If the notice is sent by first-class mail or statutory overnight delivery, it shall be deemed to have been given when deposited in the United States mail or with a commercial firm regularly engaged in the business of document delivery;

In addition to the methods of notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this Code section, notice of meetings, including annual and special meetings, may be delivered by electronic transmission, including but not limited to e-mails, pursuant to Code Section 14-2-141;

If such notice is of a meeting, it shall specify the place, day, and hour of the meeting. Notice of a meeting of shareholders shall be given not less than ten nor more than 60 days before the meeting. Notice of a special meeting shall specify the general nature of the business to be transacted;

Any written notice required to be given under this chapter need not be given if there is a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or on behalf of the corporation entitled to such notice or by their proxy, whether before or after the time when the notice would otherwise be required to be given, provided that no such waiver shall apply by its terms to more than one required notice;

Attendance of a person, either in person or by proxy, at any meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting was not lawfully called or convened; and

If the language of a proposed resolution or a proposed plan requiring approval by shareholders is included in a written notice of a meeting of shareholders, the shareholders’ meeting considering the resolution or plan may adopt it with such clarifying or other amendments as do not enlarge its original purpose without further notice to shareholders not present in person or by proxy.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-107, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 2/SB 82; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 7/SB 465; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 2/HB 184; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 1/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “or” following “in person” in the first sentence of paragraph (1). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-7.
Publication of notices or advertisements.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice or advertisement required by this chapter to be published in a newspaper shall be published once a week for four weeks in the newspaper which is, on the date of the first such publication, the official organ (as determined pursuant to Code Section 9-13-142) of the county which is or is to be the location of the main office of the financial institution.

The department may waive or modify any requirement to publish a notice:

In order to facilitate a merger, consolidation, or sale of assets when one of the parties is a failed or failing bank as determined by the commissioner;

Whenever it determines that the public benefit is not significantly served by a second or subsequent publication in a situation where a series of transactions would otherwise require multiple publications;

Where a similar publication required by another state or federal regulator serves substantially the same purpose;

By regulation or order, whenever it determines that a lesser number of publications will reduce administrative burden and will adequately serve the public benefit of the notice; or

For other reasons of regulatory parity.

The department may require proof of publication or modified publication having been completed prior to consummation of the underlying transaction.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment (enactment) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 7, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 2.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Notification of filing and protest, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Applications, Registrations, and Notifications, Rule 80-1-1-.04.

7-1-8.
Applicability of common law.

Unless expressly or impliedly displaced by this chapter, general principles of common law shall apply to financial institutions.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-109, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-9.
Reservation of power over financial institutions.

The General Assembly shall at all times have power to prescribe such regulations, provisions, and limitations as it may deem advisable, which regulations, provisions, and limitations shall be binding upon financial institutions that are subject to this chapter. The General Assembly shall have the power to amend, repeal, or modify this chapter at pleasure.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-110, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-10.
Rules of construction.

The rules of statutory construction contained in Chapter 3 of Title 1 shall apply to this title.

Unless otherwise specifically indicated and to the full extent permitted by the Constitution of Georgia, any reference in this title to an existing statute or regulation shall mean to such statute or regulation as has been or may in the future be amended or have material added to it. If in any case such construction is not constitutionally permissible, such reference shall mean to the statute or regulation as it existed on July 1, 2016.

Any reference in this title to an action by a superior court or other court shall authorize a judge of such court to take such action in term or in vacation, whether present in the county or absent from it.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-2/HB 811.

7-1-11.
[Repealed] Registration of nonresident corporations.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-5/HB 233; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-1/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section.